Utah statutes.
63I-1-213.   Repeal dates, Title 13.

(1)  Title 13, Chapter 16, Motor Fuel Marketing Act, is repealed July 1, 2012.

(2)  Title 13, Chapter 46, Independent Contractor Database Act, is repealed July 1, 2013.

